North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-16.1 Operation of Water Resource Districts
61-16.1-14.
Contracts for construction or maintenance of project.

If the cost of construction or maintenance of a project does not exceed the amount provided for construction of a public improvement under section 48-01.2-02, the work may be done on a day work basis or a contract may be let without being advertised. If the cost of the construction or maintenance exceeds the amount provided for construction of a public improvement under section 48-01.2-02, the board must let a contract in accordance with chapter 48-01.2.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1993, ch. 604, § 1; 1995, ch. 443, § 25; 2003, ch. 554, § 1; 2007, ch. 403, § 21.

Cross-References.

Contracts for cleaning or repairing drains, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-45.

Letting contracts for construction of drains, see N.D.C.C. §§ 61-21-24, 61-21-25.

Licensing contractors, see N.D.C.C. ch. 43-07.

Preferences in awarding public contracts, see N.D.C.C. §§ 44-08-01 to 44-08-02.

61-16.1-15.
Financing project through revenue bonds, general taxes, or special assessments — Apportionment of benefits.

A water resource board shall have the authority, either upon request or by its own motion, to acquire needed interest in property and provide for the cost of construction, alteration, repair, operation, and maintenance of a project through issuance of improvement warrants or with funds raised by special assessments, general tax levy, issuance of revenue bonds, or by a combination of general ad valorem tax, special assessments, and revenue bonds. Whenever a water resource board decides to acquire property or interests in property to construct, operate, alter, repair, or maintain a project with funds raised in whole or in part through special assessments, such assessments shall be apportioned to and spread upon lands or premises benefited by the project in proportion to and in accordance with benefits accruing thereto. The board shall assess the proportion of the cost of the project, or the part of the cost to be financed with funds raised through levy and collection of special assessments which any lot, piece, or parcel of land shall bear in proportion to the benefits accruing thereto and any county, city, or township which is benefited thereby. In determining assessments, the water resource board shall carry out to the maximum extent possible the water management policy of this chapter that upstream landowners must share with downstream landowners the responsibility to provide for the proper management of surface waters.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-16.
Revenue bonds.

Each district shall have the power and authority to issue revenue bonds, not exceeding an aggregate total outstanding of fifty million dollars, for the purpose of financing construction of projects and incidental facilities authorized by this chapter. Issuance of revenue bonds must be approved by two-thirds of all of the members of the water resource board. The district shall pledge sufficient revenue from any revenue-producing facility constructed with the aid of revenue bonds for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds and shall establish rates for the facilities at a sufficient level to provide for the operation of such facilities and for the bond payments. Revenue bonds shall not be a general obligation of any county and shall not be secured by property taxes.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1987, ch. 259, § 14; 2017, ch. 422, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

61-16.1-17.
Financing of special improvements — Procedure.

When it is proposed to finance in whole or in part the construction of a project with funds raised through the collection of special assessments levied against lands and premises benefited by construction and maintenance of such project, the water resource board shall examine the proposed project, and if in its opinion further proceedings are warranted, it shall adopt a resolution and declare that it is necessary to construct and maintain the project. The resolution shall briefly state the nature and purpose of the proposed project and shall designate a registered engineer to assist the board. For the purpose of making examinations or surveys, the board or its employees, after written notice to each landowner, may enter upon any land on which the proposed project is located or any other lands necessary to gain access. The engineer shall prepare profiles, plans, and specifications of the proposed project and estimates of the total cost thereof. The estimate of costs prepared by the engineer shall include acquisition of right of way and shall be in sufficient detail to allow the board to determine the probable share of the total costs that will be assessed against each of the affected landowners in the proposed project assessment district.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-18.
Hearing — Notice — Contents.

Upon the filing of the engineer’s report provided for in section 61-16.1-17, and after satisfying the requirements of section 61-16.1-21, the water resource board shall fix a date and place for public hearing on the proposed project. The place of hearing must be in the vicinity of the proposed project and must be convenient and accessible for the majority of the landowners subject to assessment for the project or whose property is subject to condemnation for the proposed project. The board shall cause a complete list of the benefits and assessments to be made, setting forth each county, township, or city assessed in its corporate capacity as well as each lot, piece, or parcel of land assessed, the amount each is benefited by the improvement and the amount assessed against each. At least ten days before the hearing, the board shall file with the county auditor of each county or counties in which the project is or will be located the list showing the percentage assessment against each parcel of land benefited by the proposed project and the approximate assessment in terms of money apportioned thereto. Notice of the filing must be included in the notice of hearing. Notices of the hearing must contain a copy of the resolution of the board as well as the time and place where the board will conduct the hearing. The notice of hearing must specify the general nature of the project as finally determined by the engineer and the board. The notice of hearing must also specify when and where votes concerning the proposed project may be filed. The assessment list showing the percentage assessment against each parcel of land benefited by the proposed project and the approximate assessment in terms of money apportioned thereto, along with a copy of the notice of the hearing, must be mailed to each affected landowner at the landowner’s address as shown by the tax rolls of the county or counties in which the affected property is located. The board may send the assessment list and notice by regular mail attested by an affidavit of mailing signed by the attorney or secretary of the board. The board shall cause the notice of hearing to be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in the newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the area in which the affected landowners reside and in the official county newspaper of each county in which the benefited lands are located. The date set for the hearing must not be less than twenty days after the mailing of the notice. A record of the hearing must be made by the board, including a list of affected landowners present in person or by agent, and the record must be preserved in the minutes of the meeting. Affected landowners, and the governing body of any county, township, or city to be assessed, must be informed at the hearing of the probable total cost of the project and their individual share of the cost and the portion of their property, if any, to be condemned for the project.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1989, ch. 752, § 2; 1999, ch. 539, § 1.

Cross-References.

Official county newspaper, see N.D.C.C. ch. 46-06.

61-16.1-19.
Voting on proposed projects.

At the hearing, the affected landowners, and any county, township, or city to be assessed, must also be informed when and where votes concerning the proposed project may be filed. Affected landowners, and the governing body of any county, township, or city to be assessed, have thirty days after the date of the hearing to file their votes with the secretary of the water resource board concerning the project. Once the deadline for filing votes has been reached, no more votes may be filed and no person may withdraw a vote. Any withdrawal of a vote concerning the proposed project before that time must be in writing. When the votes have been filed and the deadline for filing votes has passed, the board shall immediately determine whether the project is approved. If the board finds that fifty percent or more of the total votes filed are against the proposed project, then the vote constitutes a bar against proceeding further with the project. If the board finds that the number of votes filed against the proposed project is less than fifty percent of the votes filed, the board shall issue an order establishing the proposed project and may proceed, after complying with the requirements of sections 61-16.1-21 and 61-16.1-22, to contract or provide for the construction or maintenance of the project in substantially the manner and according to the forms and procedure provided in title 40 for the construction of sewers within municipalities. The board may enter into an agreement with any federal or state agency under the terms of which the contract for the project is to be let by the federal agency, the state agency, or a combination thereof. In projects in which there is an agreement that a party other than the board will let the contract, the board may dispense with all of the requirements of title 40. Upon making an order establishing or denying establishment of a project, the board shall publish notice of the order in a newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the affected landowners reside and in the official county newspaper of each county in which the benefited lands are located. Any right of appeal begins to run on the date of publication of the notice. As used in this section, “board” means water resource board.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1987, ch. 492, § 3; 1989, ch. 752, § 3.

61-16.1-20.
Voting right or powers of landowners.

In order that there may be a fair relation between the amount of liability for assessments and the power of objecting to the establishment of a proposed project, the voting rights of affected landowners on the question of establishing the project are as provided in this section. The landowner or landowners of tracts of land affected by the project have one vote for each dollar of assessment that the land is subject to or one vote for each dollar of the assessed valuation of land condemned for the project, as determined in accordance with title 57. The governing body of any county, township, or city to be assessed also has one vote for each dollar of assessment against such county, township, or city. There may be only one vote for each dollar of assessment, regardless of the number of owners of such tract of land. Where more than one owner of such land exists, the votes must be prorated among them in accordance with each owner’s property interest. A written power of attorney authorizes an agent to protest a project on behalf of any affected landowner or landowners.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 71.

Cross-References.

Drainage projects, voting rights of affected landowners, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-16.

61-16.1-21.
Assessment of cost of project.

Whenever the water resource board proposes to make any special assessment under the provisions of this chapter, the board, prior to the hearing required under section 61-16.1-18, shall inspect any and all lots and parcels of land, which may be subject to assessment and shall determine from the inspection the particular lots and parcels of lands which, in the opinion of the board, will be especially benefited by the construction of the work for which the assessment is made and shall assess the proportion of the total cost of acquiring right of way and constructing and maintaining such improvement in accordance with benefits received but not exceeding such benefits, against:

Any county, township, or city, in its corporate capacity, which may be benefited directly or indirectly thereby.

Any lot, piece, or parcel of land which is directly benefited by such improvement.

In determining benefits the board shall consider, among other factors, property values, degree of improvement of properties, productivity, and the water management policy as expressed in section 61-16.1-15. Property belonging to the United States shall be exempt from such assessment, unless the United States has provided for the payment of any assessment which may be levied against its property for benefits received. Benefited property belonging to counties, cities, school districts, park districts, and townships shall not be exempt from such assessment and political subdivisions whose property is so assessed shall provide for the payment of such assessments, installments thereof, and interest thereon, by the levy of taxes according to law. Any county, township, or city assessed in its corporate capacity for benefits received shall provide for the payment of such assessments, installments thereof, and interest thereon from its general fund or by levy of a general property tax against all the taxable property therein in accordance with law. No tax limitation provided by any statute of this state shall apply to tax levies made by any such political subdivision for the purpose of paying any special assessments made in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. There shall be attached to the list of assessments a certificate signed by a majority of the members of the board certifying that the same is a true and correct assessment of the benefit therein described to the best of their judgment and stating the several items of expense included in the assessment.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References.

Assessments for drainage projects, see N.D.C.C. §§ 61-21-20 to 61-21-30.

61-16.1-22.
Assessment list to be published — Notice of hearing — Alteration of assessments — Confirmation of assessment list — Filing.

After entering an order establishing the project, the water resource board shall cause the assessment list to be published once each week for three successive weeks in the newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the district and in the official county newspaper of each county in which the benefited lands are located together with a notice of the time when, and place where, the board will meet to hear objections to any assessment by any interested party, or an agent or attorney for that party. The board also shall mail a copy of the notice of the hearing in an envelope clearly marked “ASSESSMENT NOTICE” to each affected landowner at the landowner’s address as shown by the tax rolls of the county or counties in which the affected property is located. The date set for the hearing may not be less than thirty days after the mailing of the notice. At the hearing, the board may make such alterations in the assessments as in its opinion may be just and necessary to correct any error in the assessment but must make the aggregate of all assessments equal to the total amount required to pay the entire cost of the work for which the assessments are made, or the part of the cost to be paid by special assessment. An assessment may not exceed the benefit as determined by the board to the parcel of land or political subdivision assessed. The board shall then confirm the assessment list and the secretary shall attach to the list a certificate that the same is correct as confirmed by the board and shall file the list in the office of the secretary.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1999, ch. 539, § 2; 2017, ch. 423, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Official county newspaper, see N.D.C.C. ch. 46-06.

61-16.1-23.
Appeal to department of water resources.

After the hearing provided for in section 61-16.1-22, affected landowners and any political subdivision subject to assessment, having not less than twenty percent of the possible votes as determined by section 61-16.1-20, who believe the assessment was not made fairly or equitably or the project is not located or designed properly, may appeal to the department of water resources by petition, within ten days after the hearing on assessments, to make a review of the assessments and to examine the location and design of the proposed project. Upon receipt of the petition the department shall examine the lands assessed and the location and design of the proposed project, and if it appears the assessments were not made equitably, the department may correct the assessments, and the department’s correction and adjustment of the assessment is final. If the department believes the project was located or designed improperly, the department may order a relocation and redesign that must be followed in the construction of the proposed project. Upon filing a bond for two hundred fifty dollars with the board for the payment of the costs of the department in the matter, any landowner or political subdivision claiming the landowner or political subdivision will receive no benefit from the construction of a new project may appeal that issue to the department within ten days after the hearing on assessments. Upon an appeal by an individual landowner or political subdivision, the department may determine whether there is any benefit to the landowner or political subdivision, but not the specific amount of benefit. The determination of the department regarding whether there is a benefit is final.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1985, ch. 680, § 1; 1987, ch. 742, § 1; 2017, ch. 423, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 488, § 148, effective August 1, 2021.

61-16.1-24.
When assessments may be made.

After the requirements of this chapter have been satisfied and a contract and bond for any work for which a special assessment is to be levied have been approved by the water resource board, the board may direct special assessments to be levied for the payment of appropriate costs, and the secretary shall certify to the board the items of total cost to be paid by special assessments so far as they have been ascertained. The certificate shall include the estimated construction cost under the terms of any contract, a reasonable allowance for cost of extra work which may be authorized under the plans and specifications, acquisition of right of way, engineering, fiscal agents’ and attorney’s fees for any services in connection with the authorization and financing of the improvement, cost of publication of required notices, and printing of improvement warrants, cost necessarily paid for damages caused by such improvement, interest during the construction period, and all expenses incurred in making the improvement and levy of assessments.

In no event shall any contract or contracts be awarded which exceed, by twenty percent or more, the estimated cost of the project as presented to and approved by the affected landowners.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-25.
Financial reports — Liability for deficiencies.

In June and December of each year and as otherwise required by the county commission appointing the managers of the district, the district treasurer shall report to the water resource board in writing the amount of money in the treasury, the receipts, if any, in the preceding period and the amount and items of expenditure during that period. The report shall be verified and filed with the secretary of the district. A verified copy of the report shall also be filed in the office of the county auditor of each county in which the district lies and shall be open to public inspection.

During the month of January of each year, the water resource board shall prepare a complete statement of the condition of the finances of the district for the past year and shall cause the same to be filed with the county auditor of each county in which the district lies on or before February first next following. Such statement shall show separately, and in detail, the condition and resources of each and every assessment fund for the payment of project warrants of the district, including the amount of any anticipated deficit and the apportionment thereof. At its February meeting next following the filing of the statement of condition of any district, the board of county commissioners shall examine the statement and make inquiry regarding the same to determine whether or not the district has defaulted or may soon default on payment of its financial obligations as the same become due.

Whenever all special assessments collected for a project are insufficient to pay the special assessment warrants issued against such project, coming due within the following thirteen months, with interest, the board of county commissioners of each of the counties wherein the district lies shall advance to the district project warrant fund an amount sufficient to pay the deficiency attributable to benefited property in each county. If it appears to the board at any time that a deficiency exists or is likely to occur within one year in such project warrant fund for the payment of principal or interest due or to become due on such warrants, the board of county commissioners of each of the counties wherein the district lies, in order to forestall imminent deficiency in such fund or to promptly restore the ability of such fund to pay principal and interest punctually as the same become due, shall advance to such project fund the amount necessary to cover the anticipated deficiency attributable to benefited property in such county. In order to make such advances, the board of county commissioners of each of the counties shall levy a general tax upon the taxable property in the county, and may issue certificates of indebtedness against levies so made, or shall pay such advances from its general fund. Advances made by the county or counties shall be obligations of the district to be met out of any surplus in the district project warrant fund, and future district budgets and tax levies for the district after provision has been made for necessary current expenses. No tax limitation provided by any statute of this state shall apply to tax levies made by any county for the purpose of making any advances in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1985, ch. 676, § 2; 1985, ch. 677, § 2.

61-16.1-26.
Reassessment of benefits.

The water resource board may hold at any time or, upon petition of any affected landowner or political subdivision which has been assessed after a project has been in existence for at least one year, shall hold a hearing for the purpose of determining the benefits of such project to each tract of land affected. Notice of the hearing must be given by publication once each week for three consecutive weeks, beginning at least thirty days before the hearing, in the newspaper or newspapers having general circulation in the district and in the official county newspaper of each county in which the benefited lands are located and by mailing notice of the hearing in an envelope clearly marked “ASSESSMENT NOTICE” to each owner of land in the assessed district at the landowner’s address as shown by the tax rolls of the counties in which the affected property is located. The provisions of this chapter governing the original determination of benefits and assessment of costs apply to any reassessment of benefits carried out under this section. The board may not be forced to make such reassessment more than once every ten years, nor may any assessment or balance thereof supporting a project fund be reduced or impaired by reassessment or otherwise so long as bonds payable out of such fund remain unpaid and moneys are not available in such fund to pay all such bonds in full, with interest. Costs of maintenance must be prorated in accordance with any plan for reassessment of benefits that has been adopted.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1989, ch. 753, § 1; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2017, ch. 423, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Official county newspaper, see N.D.C.C. ch. 46-06.

Reassessment of benefits of drainage project, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-44.

61-16.1-27.
Correction of errors and mistakes in special assessments — Requirements governing.

If mathematical errors or other such mistakes occur in making any assessment resulting in a deficiency in that assessment, the board shall cause additional assessments to be made in a manner substantially complying with chapter 40-26 as it relates to special assessments.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-28.
Certification of assessments to county auditor.

When a water resource board, by resolution, has caused special assessments to be levied to cover the cost of constructing a project, the board shall determine the rate of interest unpaid special assessments shall bear, which rate shall not exceed one and one-half percent above the warrant rate. Interest on unpaid special assessments shall commence on the date the assessments are finally confirmed by the board. Special assessments may be certified and made payable in equal annual installments, the last of which shall be due and payable not more than thirty years after the date of the warrants to be paid. The secretary of the district shall certify to the county auditor of the county in which the district is situated, or if the district embraces more than one county, to the county auditor of each county in which district lands subject to such special assessments are situated, the total amount assessed against such lands in that county and the proportion or percentage of such amount assessed against each piece, parcel, lot, or tract of land. The secretary of the district shall also file with the county auditor of each county in which district lands lie a statement showing the cost of the project, the part thereof, if any, which will be paid out of the general taxes, and the part to be financed by special assessments. Funds needed to pay the cost of maintaining a project may be raised in the same manner as funds were raised to meet construction costs. If the project was financed in whole or in part through the use of special assessments, the water resource board shall prorate the costs of maintaining projects in the same proportion as were the original costs of construction or, in the event a reassessment of benefits has been adopted, the costs shall be prorated in accordance with the reassessment of benefits as authorized by section 61-16.1-54.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-29.
Extension of special assessments on tax lists — Collection — Payment to district.

The county auditor of each county shall extend the special assessments certified to the county auditor on the tax list of the district for the current year and such assessments, with interest and penalties, if any, shall be collected by the county treasurer as general taxes are collected and shall be paid to the treasurer of the district.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References.

Collection of drain taxes, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-28.

61-16.1-30.
Lien of special assessment.

A special assessment imposed by a district, together with interest and penalties which accrue thereon, shall become a lien upon the property on which the assessment is levied from the time the assessment list is approved by the water resource board until the assessment is fully paid. Such liens shall have precedence over all other liens except general tax liens and shall not be divested by any judicial sale. No mistake in the description of the property covered by the special assessment lien or in the name of the owner of such property shall defeat the lien if the assessed property can be identified by the description in the assessment list. This chapter shall be considered notice to all subsequent encumbrancers of the priority of special assessments imposed under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References.

Lien and enforcement of drain assessments, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-52.

When special assessment becomes lien as between vendor and vendee, see N.D.C.C. § 61-01-20.

61-16.1-31.
Foreclosure of tax lien on property when general and special assessment taxes are delinquent.

Special assessments imposed under this chapter shall become due and delinquent and shall be subject to penalties and nonpayment at the same date and rates as first installments of real estate taxes at the same time and in the same manner as provided in title 57.

If there is no delinquent general property tax against a tract or parcel of land and it is foreclosed for special assessments alone, the notice of foreclosure of tax lien shall state that the foreclosure is for special assessments and a tax deed in such case shall be issued in the usual course of procedure.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1999, ch. 503, § 44.

61-16.1-32.
Collection of tax or assessment levied not to be enjoined or declared void — Exceptions.

The collection of any tax or assessment levied or ordered to be levied to pay for the location and construction of any project under the provisions of this chapter shall not be enjoined perpetually or absolutely declared void by reason of any of the following:

Any error of any officer or board in the location and establishment thereof.

Any error or informality appearing in the record of the proceedings by which any project was established.

A lack of any proper conveyance or condemnation of the right of way.

The court in which any proceeding is brought to reverse or declare void the proceedings by which any project has been established, or to enjoin the tax levied to pay therefor, on application of either party, shall order examination of the premises, or survey of the same, or both, as may be deemed necessary. The court, on a final hearing, shall enter an order which is just and equitable, and may order the tax or any part thereof to remain on the tax lists for collection, or if the tax were paid under protest, may order, if justice requires, the whole or any part thereof to be refunded. The costs of such proceedings shall be apportioned among the parties as justice may require.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References.

Drainage assessments, actions to declare void or enjoin collection, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-40.

61-16.1-33.
Water resource board may apportion assessments for benefits of a project against a county or city or any tract of land benefited.

Whenever a water resource board discovers or ascertains that the county, a township, or city therein, or that any tract, parcel, or piece of land is being benefited by a project and that the county or such township, municipality, tract, piece, or parcel of land was not included in the project area assessed for the cost of construction and maintenance of the project when established, the board shall commence proceedings for reassessment of lands originally assessed for the cost of establishing and constructing such project and shall apportion and assess the part of the balance remaining unpaid, if any, of the cost of such project, and the expense of maintenance, which such county, township, or city and each tract of land found benefited thereby should bear.

Before making such reassessment or reapportionment of benefits, the board shall hold a hearing for the purpose of determining the benefits of the project to the county, such township, or city and to each tract, piece, or parcel of land being benefited. At least ten days’ notice of the hearing shall be given by publication in the newspaper or newspapers having general circulation in the county and by mailing notice thereof to each owner of land assessed for the cost of construction and maintenance when the project was established, and by mailing such notice to the governing body of the county, township, municipality, and to the owner, as determined by the records in the office of the recorder or county treasurer of each tract, piece, or parcel of land found to be benefited since the establishment of the project. The provisions of this chapter governing the original determination of benefits and assessment of costs shall apply to the reassessment and assessment of benefits carried out under the provisions of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

61-16.1-34.
Warrants — When payable — Amounts — Interest — Interest coupons.

A district may, at any time after entering into a contract for a project to be financed in whole or in part by special assessments, issue temporary and definitive warrants on the project fund, created for that purpose, in the manner and subject to the limitations prescribed in section 40-24-19. If the warrants are issued to finance a sewer or water project, the net revenues derived from the imposition of service charges to be imposed and collected with respect thereto as provided in section 40-22-16 may be pledged to payment of those warrants, except that the first maturity date of any such warrant shall not be less than two years from the date of issuance. Warrants issued under this section shall be in such amounts as in the judgment of the water resource board will be necessary for the project. The warrants shall bear interest at a rate or rates and be sold at a price resulting in an average net interest cost not exceeding twelve percent per annum if sold at private sale. There is no interest rate ceiling on warrant issues sold at public sale or to the state of North Dakota or any of its agencies or instrumentalities. Coupons evidencing the interest for each year or half year, as the case may be, may be attached to the warrants. The warrants shall state upon their face the purpose for which they are issued and the project fund from which they are payable and shall be signed by the chairman of the water resource board and countersigned by the secretary of the district. The warrants shall be payable serially in such amounts as the board determines, extending over a period of not more than thirty years.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-35.
Warrants may be used in making payments on contract — Warrants payable out of fund on which drawn — May be used to pay special assessments.

Improvement warrants may be used in making payments on contracts for construction of the project for which the special assessment fund was created, or may be sold for cash at not less than ninety-eight percent of par and accrued interest, and the proceeds thereof, less accrued interest, shall be credited to the construction account of such fund and shall be used exclusively to pay such contracts and construction costs. Any balance remaining in any construction account after completion of a project shall be transferred to the sinking fund account of the assessment fund. The treasurer of the district shall pay special assessment warrants and any interest coupons attached thereto as they mature and are presented for payment out of the fund on which they are drawn and shall cancel the warrants and any coupons when paid.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-36.
Refunding special assessment warrants — Purposes for which such warrants may be issued — Payment of warrants.

Any district having outstanding special assessment warrants, payable in whole or in part out of collections from special assessments, which are past due or which are redeemable, either at the option of the district or with the consent of the warrant holders, may issue refunding special assessment warrants or bonds if there is not sufficient money in the project fund against which such warrants are drawn to pay the same. The issuance of refunding warrants or bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the water resource board. The resolution shall describe the warrants to be refunded and the amount and maturity thereof. Refunding warrants may be issued for any of the following purposes:

Extend the maturities of warrants payable in whole or in part by special assessments.

Reduce the interest on such warrants.

Equalize the general property tax which the district may be, or may become, obligated to levy in order to cover deficiencies in the fund against which warrants were issued.

Refunding warrants or bonds shall bear such date, be in such date, be in such denominations, and shall mature serially within such time, not exceeding thirty years from the date of issuance, as the water resource board shall determine. The average rate of interest on such warrants shall not exceed the average rate of interest on refunded warrants.

The treasurer of the district shall pay special assessment warrants, and the interest coupons attached thereto, as they mature and are presented for payment out of the fund against which they are drawn and shall cancel the warrants when paid.

Any deficiency in any fund created for the payment of district warrants payable in whole or in part out of collections of special assessment taxes shall be the general obligation of the water resource district.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-37.
Commission, department of water resources, and water resource board shall encourage both structural and nonstructural alternatives.

The commission, department of water resources, and the appropriate water resource board shall encourage both structural and nonstructural solutions to water management problems within the district by federal and state agencies, private individuals, and other persons, and shall lend their assistance to facilitate appropriate solutions. All structural alternatives, including dams, dikes, drains, and other works, whether constructed by public authorities or private persons, are subject to all the provisions of this chapter unless specifically exempted.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2021, ch. 488, § 149, effective August 1, 2021.